DI-35
DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DTC P003 1 | Oxygen SensorHeater Control Circuit Low
(Bank 1 Sensor 1)

DTC P0032 | Oxygen Sensor Heater Control Circuit High
(Bank 1 Sensor 1)

DTC P0037 | Oxygen Sensor Heater Control Circuit Low
(Bank 1 Sensor2)

DTC P0038 | Oxygen Sensor Heater Control Circuit High
(Bank 1 Sensor2)

DTC P0051 | Oxygen SensorHeater Control Circuit Low
(Bank2Sensor 1)

DTC P0052 | Oxygen Sensor Heater Control Circuit High
(Bank2Sensor 1)

DTC P0057 | Oxygen Sensor Heater Control Circuit Low
(Bank 2 Sensor 2)

DTC P0058 | Oxygen Sensor Heater Control Circuit High
(Bank 2 Sensor 2)
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CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

Toobtain a high purification rate forthe CO, HC and NOx components ofthe exhaust gas, athree -way cata-
Iytic converteris used, but forthe most efficient use ofthe three —way catalytic converter,theair —fuelratio
must be precisely controlled sothatitis always close to the stoichiometric air —fuelratio.

The heated oxygen sensor has the characteristic which its output voltage changes suddenly in the vicinity
ofthe stoichiometricair —fuelratio. This characteristicis usedto detectthe oxygen concentrationinthe ex-
haust gas and provide the engine control ECU with feedback to control the air —fuelratio.

Whentheair —fuelratiobecomesLEAN,the oxygen concentrationinthe exhaustincreases andthe heated
oxygen sensor informs the engine control ECU of the LEAN condition (low voltage, i.e. less than 0.45 V).
Whentheair —fuelratiois RICHER thanthe stoichiometric air —fuel ratio, the oxygen concentrationinthe ex-
haust gas is reduced and the heated oxygen sensor informs the engine control ECU of the RICH condition
(high voltage, i.e. more than 0.45 V). The engine control ECU judges by the voltage output from the heated
oxygensensorwhethertheair -fuelratiois RICH or LEAN and controls the injectiontime accordingly. Howev-
er, if malfunction of the heated oxygen sensor causes output of abnormal voltage, this disables the engine
control ECU for performinganaccurateair  —fuelratio control. The heated oxygen sensorsinclude a heater
which heats the zirconia element. The heater is controlled by the engine control ECU. When the intake air
volume is low (the temperature of the exhaust gas is low) current flows to the heater to heat the sensor for
accurate oxygen concentration detection.
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HINT:
The engine control ECU provides a pulse width modulated control circuit to adjust current through the heater.

The heated oxygen sensor heater circuit uses a relay on the B+ side of the circuit.

Reference (Bank 1 Sensor 1 System Drawing):
Engine Control ECU
EFI or ECD Relay Heated Oxygen Sensor g
e HT1A
OO
Batlery  EFior ECD EFl or ECD
FuseNo. 1 FuseNo.2 OX1A
Duty
E2 Control
Ground -
Y A22009
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DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
P0031 * Openinheater circuit of heated
Heater current is 0.25 A or less when the heater operates with peninheaercirar.oThealedoxygen sensor
P0037 . R N * Heated axygen sensor haatac
morethian 10.5V positive battery voltage
P0051 . . ) *EFlorECDrelay
(1 trip detectionlogic) )
P0057 * Engine control ECU
P0032 « Shortin heater circuit of heated oxygen sensor
P0038 When heater does notoperates, heater currentexceeds 2.0 A » Heated oxygen sensor heater
P0052 (1 tripdetectionlogic) *EFlorECDrelay
P0058 * Engine control ECU
HINT:
. Bank 1 refersto banktheincludes cylinder No. 1.
. Bank 2refersto bankthatdoes notincludes cylinder No. 1.

. Sensor 1 referstothe sensor closertothe engine assembly.
»  Sensor2referstothe sensorfartheraway fromthe engine assembly.

MONITOR DESCRIPTION

The sensing portion of the heated oxygen sensor has a zirconia element which is used to detect oxygen
concentration in the exhaust. If the zirconia element is at the proper temperature and difference of the oxy-
gen concentration between the inside and outside surface of sensor is large, the zirconia element will gener-
ate voltage signals. In order to increase the oxygen concentration detecting capacity in the zirconia element,
the engine control ECU supplements the heat from the exhaust with heat from a heating element inside the
sensor. When heater current in the sensor is out of the standard operating range, the engine control ECU
interprets this as a fault in the heated oxygen sensor and sets a DTC.

Example:

The engine control ECU will set a high current DTC if the current in the sensor is more than 2.0 A. Similarly,
the engine control ECU will set a low current DTC if the current is less than 0.25 A when the heater is ON.
The monitor runs if conditions below is met:

Engine is started and run at idle for 9 minutes or more.
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

Read freeze frame data using hand-held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions when
the malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, it is useful to determine whether the vehicle was running
or stopped, the engine was warmed up or not, the air—fuel ratio was lean or rich, etc. at the time of the mal-
function.

1 | Check resistance of heated oxygen sensor heater.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the H11, H12, H13 or H14 heated oxygen sensor

+B HT
/ N connector.
//:\\

CHECK.:

Components Side:

@ 2|1 Measure resistance between terminals of the heated oxygen
sensor.
@ 413 OK:
/\\ES\// Tester Connection Specified Condition
El ox HT (H11-1) - +B (H11-2) 11.7 t0 14.3 Q (20°C)
Bankl Sensorl, Bank2 Sensorl ' '
HT (H12-1) - +B (H12-2) 11.7 t0 14.3 Q (20°C)
+B HT 3
o HT (H13-1) - +B (H13-2) 11.7 t0 14.3 Q (20°C)
\¢'ﬁ§/ HT (H14-1) - +B (H14-2) 11.7 t0 14.3 Q (20°C)
@ (12

1
4 |3
El /\u—\_n’/ lC\ox NG> Replace heated oxygen sensor.

c Bank1 Sensor2, Bank2 Sensor2

A20870

OK
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2 | Check EFI or ECD relay.

EFIl or ECD Relay

1 3 2|4
g1
) . 1]3]
A21543
OK

2UZ-FE ENGINE SUP (RM1113E)

PREPARATION:

Remove the EFI or ECD relay from the engine room R/B.

CHECK:
Inspect the EFI or ECD relay.
OK:

Terminal No. Condition Specified Condition
2-4 Constant Continuity
Usually No Continuity
1-3 Apply B+ between
Continui
terminals 2 and 4 ontinuity

NG Replace EFI or ECD relay.
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3 | Check voltage between terminals HT1A, HT2A, HT1B, HT2B of engine control

ECU connectors and body ground.

PREPARATION:
HT1B Turn the ignition switch ON.

(E® HTIA CHECK:

iy

/’:@ =% F@ﬁfuj] Measure the voltage between terminals of the engine control

ECU connectors and body ground.

—_— HINT:
\“’( N W s Connect terminal HT1A to the bank 1 sensor 1.

HT2A HT2B
p aissz2 ENgGine Control ECU Connector 4963

K

S Connect terminal HT1B to the bank 1 sensor 2.
S Connect terminal HT2A to the bank 2 sensor 1.
S Connect terminal HT2B to the bank 2 sensor 2.
OK:

Tester Connection

Specified Condition

HT1A (E8-4) — Body ground 9to 14V
HT1B (E8-5) — Body ground 9to 14V
HT2A (E8-33) - Body ground 9to 14V
HT2B (E8-25) - Body ground 9to 14V

OK Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E, page FI-74).

NG

Check and repair harness or connector between EFl or ECD relay and heated oxygen sensor, and

heated oxygen sensor and engine control ECU (See page IN-20).
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